Delaware, session 153, HB178.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter , Title 14 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 136. Criminal background checks. (a) The following individuals must submit to a criminal background check: 1. Current Department of Education employees. 2. Individuals conditionally offered employment with the Department of Education. (b) Any current or prospective contractor or third party that may require access to student records may be required by the Secretary to submit to a criminal background check. (c) Individuals required to obtain a background check under this section must submit fingerprints and other necessary information to the State Bureau of Identification in order to obtain the following: (1) A report of the individualâs entire state criminal history record information from the State Bureau of Identification or a statement that the State Bureau of Identification Central Repository contains no such information relating to that individual. (2) A report of the individualâs entire federal criminal history record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation or a statement that the Federal Bureau of Investigationâs records contain no such information relating to that individual. (d) The State Bureau of Identification must forward all information obtained under paragraphs (c)(1) and (c)(2) of this section to the Department. (e) If a current employee, contractor, or third party obtains a background check under this section, the State Bureau of Identification must provide all of the following to the Department: (1) Any subsequent state criminal history record information of the individual. (2)AnyÂ  subsequent criminal history record information of the individual available through the Rap Back System as defined under Section 8502 of Title 11, if the Rap Back System is available. (f) The Department of Education has the right to review and use criminal background information obtained under this section to the extent permitted by applicable law, including in determining an individualâs qualification for employment or continued access to Department systems, facilities, or data. (g) Current Department employees and contractors must submit the information required by subsection (c) of this section to the State Bureau of Identification no later than 30 days after receipt of the Departmentâs written request to submit to a background check.